North Carolina, session 2025, HB417.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Hoke County for upgrades at Rockfish
Park in the Town of Raeford.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H417-v-1*